Utah statutes.
75-3-717.   Powers of surviving personal representative.

Unless the terms of the will otherwise provide, every power exercisable by personal co-representatives may be exercised by the one or more remaining after the appointment of one or more is terminated, and if one of two or more nominated as co-executors is not appointed, those appointed may exercise all the powers incident to the office.

